Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6205.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 4001a. As used in this chapter, "garnishable earnings" means an individual's gross wages minus any amounts required by law to be deducted, exempted, or withheld. Sec. 4031. (1) The provisions of the this act and any other statutes relating that relate to exemptions from execution, and the manner of levying upon on property belonging that belongs to a class or species in which exemptions are allowed by law, allowed, shall be applicable apply to the application of property and obligations to claims by attachment and garnishment. (2) In any a garnishment proceeding where in which the indebtedness of the garnishee to the principal defendant is money owed to the principal defendant on account because of (a) the sale to the garnishee of milk or cream, or both, produced on the farm or farms of the principal defendant, the garnishee's liability to the plaintiff is limited to 40% of such the money. ; (b) personal labor performed by the principal defendant or his family, the garnishee's liability to the plaintiff is limited by the exemptions allowed under section 7511. Sec. 4032. Subject to section 4061a, the money that a debtor receives as payment of any of the following is exempt from garnishment: (a) Any means-tested public assistance benefits. (b) Unemployment compensation benefits. (c) A federal earned income tax credit allowed under 26 USC 32. (d) A state tax credit under section 272 of the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.272, or a similar credit under a program of this state or a local unit of government providing an earned income tax credit. (e) Disability benefits. (f) Worker's disability compensation benefits. Sec. 4033. (1) From the portion of a debtor's gross wages for a week that does not exceed $1,925.00, the lesser of the following is the amount subject to garnishment: (a) Twenty percent of the debtor's garnishable earnings. (b) The amount by which the debtor's garnishable earnings exceed 30 times the federal minimum wage. (2) From the portion of a debtor's gross wages for a week that exceeds $1,925.00, 30% of the debtor's garnishable earnings are subject to garnishment.